Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2146
Utilities district; annual audit; information; access.

The Auditor of Public Accounts and the person making the examination and audit pursuant to section 14-2145 shall have access to all books, records, vouchers, papers, contracts, or other data containing information on the subject in the office of the board of such metropolitan utilities district, in the office of the individual appointed in section 14-2109, or in the possession or under the control of any of the agents or employees of the district. It is hereby made the duty of all officers, agents, and employees of the district to furnish to the auditor and his or her agents and employees such information regarding the auditing of the metropolitan utilities district as may be demanded.

Laws 1915, c. 211, § 2, p. 470;

C.S.1922, § 3769;

C.S.1929, § 14-1025;

R.S.1943, § 14-1035;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1035;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 46;

Laws 2000, LB 692, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB207, § 3.